tests/test.lexd
PATTERNS
:VerbInfl :VerbApplicative :VerbCausative VerbLemma VerbInfl: VerbApplicative: VerbCausative:

LEXICON VerbLemma
a:a
adiat:{A}diat
adiava:{A}diava
adu:{A}du
amise:{A}mise
ana:{A}na
ananar:{A}nanar
ane:{A}ne
ania:{A}nia
aniau:{A}niau
aniwar:{A}niwar
anota:{A}nota
anu:{A}nu
apai:{A}pai
ape:{A}pe
api:{A}pi
ara:{A}ra
ariarir:{A}riarir
aririarir:{A}ririarir
as:{A}s
asiei:{A}siei
asiwar:{A}siwar
atore:{A}tore
avakir:{A}vakir
avi:{A}vi
avute:{A}vute
aware:{A}ware
awawai:{A}wawai
awer:{A}wer
awia:{A}wia
bai:b{A}i
bajor:b{A}jor
deriasi:deriasi
ena:ena
iravesie:iravesie
iri:iri
isa:isa
isani:isani
isi:isi
ka:k{A}
kadadiri:k{A}dadiri
kais:k{A}is
kamadiwa:k{A}madiwa
kamanam:k{A}manam
kamaru:k{A}maru
kambarai:k{A}mbarai
kanisu:k{A}nisu
kapori:k{A}pori
karamut:k{A}ramut
karier:k{A}rier
karieri:k{A}rieri
karipe:k{A}ripe
kariria:k{A}riria
karotui:k{A}rotui
karutarera:k{A}rutarera
kase:k{A}se
kasie:k{A}sie
kasiou:k{A}siou
kavera:k{A}vera
kavio:k{A}vio
kaye:k{A}ye
kerat:kerat
keri:keri
kivari:kivari
kopa:kopa
kotar:kotar
kubira:kubira
kutu:kutu
mamaya:m{A}maya
mamu:m{A}mu
manau:m{A}nau
manggar:m{A}ŋgar
marandi:m{A}randi
marariat:m{A}rariat
mararieti:m{A}rarieti
marera:m{A}rera
marera:m{A}rera
mari:m{A}ri
marior:m{A}rior
marova:m{A}rova
maroya:m{A}roya
marura:m{A}rura
marutu:m{A}rutu
masa:m{A}sa
masivaveri:m{A}sivaveri
maso:m{A}so
masop:m{A}sop
masubat:m{A}subat
matai:m{A}tai
matitiotap:m{A}titiotap
maye:m{A}ye
mayo:m{A}yo
meire:meire
mesari:mesari
mosi:mosi
mun:mun
musane:musane
nai:n{A}i
nanari:n{A}nari
nanaripi:n{A}naripi
naya:n{A}ya
nei:nei
newe:newe
newi:newi
nganggat:ŋ{A}ŋgat
nomu:nomu
nunu:nunu
o:o
one:one
osa:osa
otabia:otabia
otara:otara
otara:otara
otu:otu
oyo:oyo
pape:p{A}pe
papo:p{A}po
pera:pera
peya:peya
poriri:poriri
posasa:posasa
posasiei:posasiei
pota:pota
pote:pote
poya:poya
pu:pu
pui:pui
ra:r{A}
rama:r{A}ma
rariorar:r{A}riorar
rau:r{A}u
rekamani:rekamani
repe:repe
rera:rera
resasi:resasi
rewas:rewas
ri:ri
riesa:riesa
rina:rina
rira:rira
ririau:ririau
riwan:riwan
ro:ro
roi:roi
rora:rora
rotu:rotu
royare:royare
ruase:ruase
rubatai:rubatai
rukusare:rukusare
rure:rure
ruri:ruri
rusasa:rusasa
rut:rut
sa:s{A}
sa:s{A}
sabaya:s{A}baya
sairara:s{A}irara
samariari:s{A}mariari
samuai:s{A}muai
sanana:s{A}nana
sanepai:s{A}nepai
sanepaya:s{A}nepaya
sanepaya:s{A}nepaya
sanevesie:s{A}nevesie
sarai:s{A}rai
sario:s{A}rio
sasara:s{A}sara
sase:s{A}se
sasera:s{A}sera
sasi:s{A}si
sasie:s{A}sie
sasiri:s{A}siri
saviori:s{A}viori
sayor:s{A}yor
se:se
sera:sera
sesa:sesa
setawa:setawa
seva:seva
siar:siar
simarai:simarai
siorap:siorap
siwara:siwara
so:so
so:so
sobata:sobata
soive:soive
sokiare:sokiare
sokiase:sokiase
som:som
sonini:sonini
sora:sora
sori:sori
sosa:sosa
sosoya:sosoya
sovera:sovera
su:su
suetawana:suetawana
sum:sum
sume:sume
suvi:suvi
suvuan:suvuan
suwasi:suwasi
ta:t{A}
taisu:t{A}isu
tandor:t{A}ndor
tapu:t{A}pu
tara:t{A}ra
tare:t{A}re
tarisu:t{A}risu
tata:t{A}ta
tatare:t{A}tare
tatira:t{A}tira
tatopa:t{A}topa
tavavu:t{A}vavu
tavera:t{A}vera
tavi:t{A}vi
taviar:t{A}viar
tawa:t{A}wa
tenam:tenam
tera:tera
tere:tere
tipira:tipira
tire:tire
tisa:tisa
tita:tita
titiai:titiai
tob:tob
topa:topa
tota:tota
tupar:tupar
turu:turu
tut:tut
tuwa:tuwa
ubira:ubira
unusar:unusar
ur:ur
urusara:urusara
usar:usar
uta:uta
utanusara:utanusara
uvietu:uvietu
vabara:v{A}bara
varakare:v{A}rakare
varo:v{A}ro
vata:v{A}ta
vaune:v{A}une
vavou:v{A}vou
vawatatar:v{A}watatar
ve:ve
vediadi:vediadi
vedior:vedior
vekapo:vekapo
venadi:venadi
veprenta:veprenta
vereri:vereri
vesikop:vesikop
vesusa:vesusa
via:via
viviare:viviare
vo:vo
vori:vori
voru:voru
vove:vove
vui:vui
vuvu:vuvu

LEXICON VerbInfl
<v><p1><du><incl>:tur
<v><p1><pl><incl>:tat
<v><p1><sg>:i
<v><p1><du><excl>:amur
<v><p1><pl><excl>:amat
<v><p2><sg>:{B}u
<v><p2><du>:mur
<v><p2><pl>:met
<v><p3><sg>:{D}i
<v><p3><du>:sur
<v><p3><pl><hum>:set
<v><p3><pl><nh>:si

LEXICON VerbApplicative
<appl>:it
:

LEXICON VerbCausative
<caus>:on
:
